Utah statutes.
38-3-5.   When attachment will issue -- Determination of priorities.

Upon the filing of such complaint, affidavit and bond it shall be the duty of the court wherein the same are filed to issue a writ of attachment to the proper officer, commanding him to seize the property of the defendant subject to such lien, or so much thereof as will satisfy the demand, and to make a determination of the priorities of the claims, liens, and security interests in such property.



Amended by Chapter 272, 1977 General Session

